Missouri, session 2026, HB3170.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 172, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 172.975, to read as follows:
172.975. 1. In exercising the powers granted under section 172.020 and other
powers granted by statute or the Constitution of Missouri, the curators of the University
of Missouri are hereby authorized and empowered to acquire, manage, lease, purchase,
sell, or otherwise acquire an interest in or participate in the ownership or operation of
hospital, medical, or other health care facilities or providers located within the twenty-
five county area described in subsection 3 of this section in accordance with agreements
entered into by the curators of the University of Missouri and third parties, including
but not limited to through the acquisition of entities engaged in the provision of health
care services or the acquisition of assets of such entities, regardless of the competitive
consequences of these activities. Nothing in this section requires any entity to enter into
an agreement with the curators of the University of Missouri.
2. The state finds that the benefits of the university engaging in the activities
described in this section outweigh any adverse impact on competition, and the state
affirmatively expresses a policy to allow the curators of the University of Missouri to
engage in the activities described in this section, notwithstanding that such activities
may have the effect of displacing competition in the provision of hospital, physician, or
other health care-related services. The engagement in such activities shall otherwise
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HCS HB 3170 2
remain subject to any applicable state certificate of need laws, including the provisions
of sections 197.300 to 197.367 and any other similar laws.
3. The board of curators of the University of Missouri and any public or private
entities and individuals with which the board collaborates shall be immunized from
liability under all federal and state antitrust laws, including section 416.031 or any
similar law, with respect to the activities described in this section within the following
twenty-five-county area: Adair, Audrain, Boone, Callaway, Camden, Chariton, Cole,
Cooper, Gasconade, Howard, Linn, Macon, Maries, Miller, Moniteau, Monroe,
Montgomery, Morgan, Osage, Pettis, Phelps, Pike, Pulaski, Randolph, and Saline.
4. Nothing in this section shall be construed to grant immunity for:
(1) Price-fixing, bid-rigging, or market-allocation schemes deemed unlawful
under the Sherman Act, 15 U.S.C. Section 1, without any inquiry into their alleged
reasonableness; or
(2) Any other anticompetitive conduct for which no defense or justification is
allowed under applicable antitrust laws.
✔